el: Προσανατολισμός δοχείου υγρών: Οριζόντιο; Χαμηλού προφίλ; Οσφυϊκό; Κάθετο; Άλλο
de: Ausrichtung des Reservoirs: Horizontal; Flach; Lendenbereich; Vertikal; Sonstiges
es: Orientación del depósito: Horizontal; Perfil bajo; Lumbar; Vertical; Otro
ko: 리저버 방향: 가로형; 로우 프로파일; 요추형; 세로형; 기타
nl: Reservoir oriëntatie: Horizontaal; Low profile; Lumbaal; Verticaal; Overig
lt-LT: Rezervuaro orientacija: Horizontalus; Žemo profilio; Juosmens; Vertikalus; Kita
th: การวางตำแหน่งถุงเก็บน้ำ: แนวนอน; รูปทรงบาง; รองรับบั้นเอว; แนวตั้ง; อื่นๆ
nb: Reservoarorientering: Horisontal; Lav profil; Korsrygg; Vertikal; Annet
ro-RO: Orientarea rezervorului: Orizontal; Profil redus; Lombar; Vertical; Altele
fr: Orientation du réservoir: Horizontal; Profil bas; Lombaire; Vertical; Autre
ru: Ориентация резервуара: Горизонтальная; Низкопрофильная; Поясничная; Вертикальная; Другое
ja: 貯水池の向き: 水平; ロープロファイル; ランバー; 垂直; その他
sv: Reservoarens orientering: Horisontell; Låg profil; Svank; Vertikal; Annat
zh-TW: 儲液罐方向: 水平; 薄型; 腰部; 垂直; 其他
it: Orientamento del serbatoio: Orizzontale; A basso profilo; Lombare; Verticale; Altro
da: Beholders retning: Vandret; Lav profil; Lænd; Lodret; Andet
pt-BR: Reservatório orientação: Horizontal; Perfil baixo; Lombar; Vertical; Outra
hr-HR: Orijentacija rezervoara: Vodoravno; Niski profil; Lumbalno; Okomito; Ostalo
zh-CN: 水袋放置方向: 水平; 扁平设计; 腰部; 垂直; 其他
vi: Hướng của hồ chứa: Ngang; Cấu hình thấp; Thắt lưng; Dọc; Khác
bg-BG: Ориентация на резервоара: Хоризонтална; Нисък профил; Лумбална; Вертикална; Други
pt-PT: Orientação do reservatório: Horizontal; Perfil baixo; Lombar; Vertical; Outra
hu: Tartály tájolása: Vízszintes; Alacsony profilú; Ágyéki; Függőleges; Egyéb
tr: Rezervuar yönü: Yatay; Düşük profil; Bel; Dikey; Diğer
cs: Orientace nádrže: Horizontální; Nízkoprofilová; Bederní; Vertikální; Jiná
sk-SK: Orientácia nádržky: Horizontálna; Nízkoprofilová; Bedrová; Vertikálna; Iné
en: Reservoir orientation: Horizontal; Low profile; Lumbar; Vertical; Other
fi: Säiliön suunta: Vaaka; Matala profiili; Lanne; Pysty; Muu
sl-SI: Usmerjenost rezervoarja: Vodoravno; Nizek profil; Ledveno; Navpično; Drugo
pl: Orientacja zbiornika: Pozioma; Niski profil; Lędźwiowa; Pionowa; Inne